Hawaii statutes.
§275-6 Party line; refusal to yield in
emergency. Any person who wilfully refuses to immediately relinquish a
party line when informed that the line is needed for an emergency call to a
fire department or police department or for medical aid or ambulance service,
or any person who secures the use of a party line by falsely stating that the
line is needed for an emergency call, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L
1957, c 190, pt of §1; Supp, §309A-2; HRS §275-6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next